Utah statutes.
78B-5-607.   When entries and writings of a decedent are prima facie evidence.

The entries and other writings of a decedent made at or near the time of the transaction, and when the decedent was in a position to know the facts stated in the entry, may be read as prima facie evidence of the facts written about, in the following cases:

(1)  the entry was made against the interest of the person making it;

(2)  it was made in a professional capacity and in the ordinary course of professional conduct; or

(3)  it was made in the performance of a duty specially enjoined by law.

